apertium-la-es.la.dix
    <pardef n="plu/ere__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>verit</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>verint</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ito</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itote</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ito</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unto</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vit</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>verunt</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>visse</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="infp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>verat</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>verant</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>visset</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>verit</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebat</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebant</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amans"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unt</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erent</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>verint</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vissent</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="addec/ere__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebit</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebunt</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uerit</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uerint</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uit</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uerunt</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uisse</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="infp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uerat</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uerant</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uisset</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uissent</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uerit</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uerint</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebat</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebant</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erent</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amans"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eant</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="pluere"><i>plu</i><par n="plu/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="addecere"><i>addec</i><par n="addec/ere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="decere"><i>dec</i><par n="addec/ere__vblex"/></e>
